Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in St. Clairsville, OH|June 28, 2016
[This was transcribed and punctuated by Factba.se's AI, Margaret, and automatically corrected based on her understanding of Donald Trump's speech patterns. It has not been edited by a human. Please double-check any quotes against the video.]
I want to thank everybody. You know I - I want to thank everybody. You know I - I want to thank everybody. You know I worked in Cincinnati, Ohio. I had a job worked in Cincinnati, Ohio. I had a job worked in Cincinnati, Ohio. I had a job with my father and it came and it was with my father and it came and it was with my father and it came and it was very successful, very, very early in my very successful, very, very early in my very successful, very, very Early in my career gave me a lot of confidence and career gave me a lot of confidence and career gave me a lot of confidence.
And if I didn't have that confidence, who if I didn't have that confidence, who if I didn't have that confidence, who knew? Maybe I wouldn't be here with you knew maybe I wouldn't be here with you knew maybe I wouldn't be here with you tonight. Believe me. So I love Ohio, I love tonight. Believe me. So I love Ohio, I love tonight.
Believe me. So I love Ohio. I love the state, I love the people Jack, the state, I love the people Jack, the state, I love the people. Jack Nicklaus is a great, great friend of mine Nicklaus is a great, great friend of mine Nicklaus is a great, great friend of mine. One of your great trip, I mean, is there a - one of your great trip, I mean, is there a one of your great trip, I mean, is there a champion like Jack, right?
Is there a champion like Jack, right? Is there a champion like Jack right? Is there a champion and we have - we have so many you champion and we have - we have so many you champion and we have - we have so many, you know, I wanted to talk to you about a few know. I wanted to talk to you about a few know.
I wanted to talk to you about a few things. And then as you know, we had things and then as you know, we had things. And then as you know, we had another suicide bombing Istanbul, Turkey, another suicide bombing Istanbul, Turkey; another suicide bombing Istanbul, Turkey. Many, many people killed many, many people.
Many, many people killed many, many people. Many, many people killed many, many people, injured folks. There's something going on injured folks, there's something going on injured folks. There's something going on that's really, really bad. All right? It's - that's really, really bad. All right? It's - that's really, really bad.
All right, it's bad and we better get smart and we bad and we better get smart and we bad and we better get smart and we better get tough. But we're not gonna better get tough, but we're not gonna better get tough, but we're not gonna have much of a country left, okay? It's have much of a country left, okay?
It's have much of a country left, okay? It's bad, bad, bad. So I just left West Virginia and I was - so I just left West Virginia and I was - so I just left West Virginia and I was with a group with a group, with a group. I didn't expect that. I didn't expect that. I didn't expect that. That's pretty good, that's our big who's - that's pretty good, that's our big who's - that's pretty good.
That's our big who's from West Virginia, from West Virginia, from West Virginia. Well, you know, in the primaries we won well, you know, in the primaries we won well, you know, in the primaries we won West Virginia by like 25 points. It was a West Virginia by like 25 points. It was a West Virginia by like 25 points.
It was a wipeout, I think I just saw all that with wipeout. I think I just saw all that with wipeout. I think I just saw all that with 25 or 28 up. So I'm never - I may never go 25 or 28 up. So I'm never - I may never go 25 or 28 up, so I'm never - I may never go back to West Virginia. What do I need back to West Virginia?
What do I need back to West Virginia? What do I need that may give me a break that may give me a break that may give me a break now I'll be back, I just left West now I'll be back. I just left West now I'll be back. I just left West Virginia, some great people. Bob Murray, Virginia, some great people. Bob Murray, Virginia, some great people.
Bob Murray and I left a lot of minors and a lot of - and I left a lot of minors and a lot of - and I left a lot of minors and a lot of minors that Hillary Clinton said she minors that Hillary Clinton said she minors that Hillary Clinton said she could have put out of business with the could have put out of business with the could have put out of business with the minds, minds, minds.
These are amazing people and it's not - these are amazing people and it's not - these are amazing people. And it's not gonna happen, remember her safe and a few gonna happen, remember her safe and a few gonna happen, remember her safe and a few months ago, right? In fact we're gonna put months ago, right.
In fact, we're gonna put months ago, right, in fact we're gonna put a lot of coal miners and coal companies, a lot of coal miners and coal companies, a lot of coal miners and coal companies out of business, okay, forget it out of business. Okay. Forget it out of business, okay, forget it and she's talking about steel companies and she's talking about steel companies and she's talking about steel companies and she's talking about plenty of other.
And she's talking about plenty of other. And she's talking about plenty of other companies too, because ultimately that's companies too, because ultimately that's companies too, because ultimately that's what is going to happen. So I made a what is going to happen. So I made a what is going to happen. So I made a speech this morning speech this morning, speech this morning in Pittsburgh.
I'm all over the place in Pittsburgh. I'm all over the place in Pittsburgh. I'm all over the place, okay? The Pittsburgh area, amazing people, okay. The Pittsburgh area, amazing people, okay. The Pittsburgh area, amazing people, amazing people and it was a well amazing people and it was a well amazing people.
And it was a well received speech and I talked about some received speech and I talked about some received speech and I talked about some different things about what we're gonna different things about what we're gonna different things about what we're gonna do. If and when - when when when we get in do if and when, when when when we get in do if and when when when when we get in there and we're gonna put our country there and we're gonna put our country there and we're gon Na put our country back to work.
We're gonna get jobs for back to work. We're gonna get jobs for back to work. We're gonna get jobs for people that don't have jobs right now of people that don't have jobs right now of people that don't have jobs right now of which there are many, many millions of which there are many, many millions of which there are many, many Millions of people, they don't have jobs, it's just people, they don't have jobs, it's just people, they don't have jobs.
It's just like unbelievable what's happening. We're like unbelievable what's happening. We're like unbelievable what's happening. We're letting our jobs go to Mexico. We're letting our jobs go to Mexico. We're letting our jobs go to Mexico. We're letting our jobs go to many other places, letting our jobs go to many other places, letting our jobs go to many other places all over the world, China and so many all over the world, China and so many all over the world, China and so many Other countries, not just China, by the other countries, not just China, by the other countries, not just China, by the way, China is the number one abuser way.
China is the number one abuser way. China is the number one abuser because of the biggest, but everybody because of the biggest, but everybody because of the biggest. But everybody, everybody is treating our jobs and our - everybody is treating our jobs and our - everybody is treating our jobs and our politicians, they're just not treating us politicians.
They're just not treating us politicians. They're just not treating us right, folks. They don't respect us. And I right folks, they don't respect us and I right folks, they don't respect us. And I will tell you this, if I win, they're will tell you this. If I win, they're will tell you this. If I win, they're gonna respect our country again, just gonna respect our country again, just gonna respect our country again, just remember that just thank you.
So I thought I'd say because thank you so I thought I'd say because thank you so I thought I'd say because in the speech today I will talk about in the speech today, I will talk about in the speech today, I will talk about different things. But in this speech, different things but in this speech different things.
But in this speech today, I gave certain points. But before today I gave certain points. But before today I gave certain points. But before that, what I do is I like to find out that what I do is I like to find out that what I do is I like to find out from an area like st. Clairsville, how from an area like st.
Clairsville, how from an area Like st. Clairsville, how are you doing right, right? And by the way, are you doing right, right? And by the way, are you doing right, right? And by the way, I have to thank your congressman who is - I have to thank your congressman who is - I have to thank your congressman who is a great guy and doing an incredible job, a great guy and doing an incredible job, a great guy and doing An incredible job for you.
Let's give him a little applause for you. Let's give him a little applause for you. Let's give him a little applause. He's done good. So I checked and I said he's done good. So I checked and I said he's done good. So I checked and I said come on folks what's going on over here come on folks, what's going on over here come on folks what's going on over here, right?
So the labor force, I have people, right. So the labor force, I have people right. So the labor force, I have people that do this for me professionally, they that do this for me professionally, they that do this for me professionally, they go to the right books, they get the right go to the right books, they get the right go to the Right books, they get the right numbers.
Unfortunately, rarely other numbers unfortunately rarely other numbers unfortunately rarely other numbers good and I've done this many numbers good and I've done this many numbers good and I've done this many times. You know, in the primaries, we had times, you know, in the primaries, we had times, you know, in the primaries we had such great a streak like nobody's had.
We such great a streak like nobody's had. We such great a streak like nobody's had. We got the most number of votes in the - got the most number of votes in the - got the most number of votes in the history of the Republican primary system history of the Republican primary system history of the Republican primary system.
Think of it almost 14 million votes and think of it almost 14 million votes and think of it almost 14 million votes. And think of it. There were 17 people think of it. There were 17 people. Think of it. There were 17 people involved. So how do you beat other people involved, so how do you beat other people involved, so how do you beat other people?
They were running against two people and they were running against two people and they were running against two people and one. So we had almost 17 - we had 17 people, one, so we had almost 17 - we had 17 people, one, so we had almost 17, we had 17 people and we had almost 14 million votes. We - and we had almost 14 million votes.
We - and we had almost 14 million votes. We won 37 states and there's really won 37 states and there's really won 37 states and there's really probably never been anything like that, probably never been anything like that. Probably never been anything like that. And it's because of the people we have a - and it's because of the people we have a - and it's because of the people we have a movement going on folks and I'm the movement going on folks and I'm the movement going on folks.
And I'm the message of nothing, believe me, I'm message of nothing. Believe me, I'm message of nothing. Believe me, I'm nothing more - I'm doing a good job as the - nothing more. I'm doing a good job as the - nothing more. I'm doing a good job as the messenger, right? That's one. I'm doing a good job this at me.
Yeah, we - I'm doing a good job this at me. Yeah, we - I'm doing a good job this at me. Yeah, we have crowds. We have turnouts and here we have crowds, we have turnouts and here we have crowds. We have turnouts and here we started a half hour early because look started a half hour early because look started a half hour early because look the people are still pouring in.
Look at the people are still pouring in, look at the people are still pouring in. Look at this big, I hope you haven't missed too this big. I hope you haven't missed too this big. I hope you haven't missed too much low. Well, I said, let's start early, much low - well, I said let's start early, much low.
Well, I said, let's start early. Do you agree what that they're all? Do you agree what that they're all? Do you agree what that they're all coming in? They're outside going through, coming in, they're outside going through, coming in, they're outside going through the machines, you know the machines. So the machines, you know the machines, so the machines, you know the machines.
So anyway. So I checked this out, the labor anyway. So I checked this out, the labor anyway, so I checked this out. The labor force in Ohio today is smaller than it force in Ohio today is smaller than it force in Ohio today is smaller than it was in the year 2000. And the number of was in the year 2000 and the number of was in the year 2000 and the number of unemployed people is larger that's not unemployed.
People is larger, that's not unemployed. People is larger, that's not so great. So great. So great federal government. Ohio has lost one in federal government, Ohio has lost one in federal government. Ohio has lost one in three manufacturing jobs since Bill, three manufacturing jobs since Bill. Three manufacturing jobs.
Since Bill Clinton signed an agreement to put China Clinton signed an agreement to put China Clinton, signed an agreement to put China into the World Trade Organization not into the World Trade Organization, not into the World Trade Organization, not good. He also signed NAFTA which was a good - he also signed NAFTA which was a good - he also signed NAFTA which was a total disaster, right.
NAFTA NAFTA has total disaster, right. NAFTA NAFTA has total disaster, right. NAFTA NAFTA has done more to destroy your community than done more to destroy your community than done more to destroy your community than any other single act. It was signed by any other single act. It was signed by any other single act.
It was signed by Bill Clinton plus one in three manufacturing jobs plus one in three manufacturing jobs plus one in three manufacturing jobs. Since Bill Clinton signed an agreement since Bill Clinton signed an agreement since Bill Clinton signed an agreement to put China into the World Trade to put China into the World Trade to put China into the World Trade Organization, not good.
He also signed Organization not good. He also signed Organization not good. He also signed NAFTA which was a total disaster right. NAFTA, which was a total disaster, right. NAFTA, which was a total disaster, right. NAFTA, NAFTA has done more to destroy NAFTA, NAFTA has done more to destroy NAFTA. NAFTA has done more to destroy your community than any other single act your community than any other single act your community than any other single act.
It was signed by Bill Clinton and I - it was signed by Bill Clinton and I. It was signed by Bill Clinton and I assume Hillary was there watching over, assume Hillary was there watching over, assume Hillary was there watching over him right? Somewhere pretty close. Hillary him right, somewhere pretty close.
Hillary him right, somewhere pretty close. Hillary supported China's entry into the World supported China's entry into the World, supported China's entry into the World Trade Organization and also ran up one Trade Organization and also ran up one Trade Organization and also ran up one trillion dollars in trade deficits with trillion dollars in Trade deficits with trillion dollars in trade deficits with China when she was Secretary of State China when she was Secretary of State China when she was Secretary of State that good.
Why would she - I mean, you think that good, why would she - I mean, you think that good, why would she - I mean, you think she looks presidential, I don't all the - she looks presidential, I don't all the - she looks presidential, I don't all the while the government Of China was paying while the government of China was paying while the government of China was paying bill a lot of money to make speeches, not bill a lot of money to make speeches, not bill a lot of money to make speeches not.
I mean is that a conflict or what st? I mean is that a conflict or what st? I mean, is that a conflict or what st. Clairsville region you think of this has Clairsville region you think of this has Clairsville region you think of this has lost half of its manufacturing jobs, lost half of its manufacturing jobs, lost half of its manufacturing jobs.
Since Bill Clinton signed NAFTA in 1994, since Bill Clinton signed NAFTA in 1994 since Bill Clinton signed NAFTA in 1994, which Hillary also supported right, so by which Hillary also supported right so by which Hillary also supported, right. So by the way, naphtha is one of the worst the way naphtha is one of the worst the way naphtha is one of the worst occurrence, maybe the worst agreement of occurrence, maybe the worst agreement of occurrence, maybe the worst agreement of the history of this country In terms of the history of this country in terms of the history of this country in terms of trade, in terms of losing our trade in terms of losing our trade in terms of losing our manufacturing, okay, WTO was bad, NAFTA was manufacturing okay.
WTO was bad, NAFTA was manufacturing okay. WTO was bad, NAFTA was a disaster since 2000. Median household, a disaster since 2000. Median household a disaster since 2000. Median household income in Ohio has declined by nine. Income in Ohio has declined by nine. Income in Ohio has declined by nine thousand dollars since 2000, the number thousand dollars since 2000, the number thousand dollars since 2000. The number of people in footsteps in Ohio has of people in footsteps in Ohio has of people in footsteps in Ohio has nearly tripled.
One in four children in nearly tripled one in four children in nearly tripled one in four children in Ohio is living in poverty. Okay, living in Ohio is living in poverty, okay. Living in Ohio is living in poverty, okay, living in poverty. Many people in Ohio have been poverty. Many people in Ohio have been poverty.
Many people in Ohio have been severely victimized by illegal severely victimized by illegal severely victimized by illegal immigrants. You know that right? Well, immigrants, you know that right? Well, immigrants, you know that right? Well, we're gonna build a well, don't we're gonna build the wall? Oh, it's gonna go up, it's gonna go up.
So oh, it's gonna go up, it's gonna go up. So oh, it's gonna go up. It's gonna go up so fast, it's gonna be as beautiful as a fast, it's gonna be as beautiful as a fast. It's gonna be as beautiful as a wall can be. It's gonna be a big wall wall can be, it's gonna be a big wall wall can be, it's gonna be a big wall.
It's gonna be a wall that works gonna be, it's gonna be a wall that works gonna be. It's gonna be a wall that works gonna be a wall that works, see the height of that, a wall that works, see the height of that, a wall that works, see the height of that ceiling. We may top it by a little bit ceiling. We may top it by a little bit ceiling.
We may top it by a little bit. That is a pretty high ceiling. Once they - that is a pretty high ceiling. Once they - that is a pretty high ceiling. Once they get up there, they're not gonna want to get up there. They're not gonna want to get up there. They're not gonna want to come down that. I could for example come down that I could for example come down that I could for example recently in Lake County an illegal recently in Lake County, an illegal recently in Lake County, an illegal immigrant was indicted on 16 counts.
Immigrant was indicted on 16 counts. Immigrant was indicted on 16 counts including murder and attempted rape that including murder and attempted rape that including murder and attempted rape that illegal immigrant had been previously illegal. Immigrant had been previously illegal immigrant had been previously released through Obama's non-enforcement released through Obama's non-enforcement released through Obama's non-enforcement policies went on a rampage policies went on a rampage.
Policies went on a - rampage went on a rampage right from 2013 to went on a rampage right. From 2013 to went on a rampage right from 2013 to 2014, the number of drug-related overdose 2014, the number of drug-related overdose 2014. The number of drug-related overdose deaths in Ohio increased by nearly 20 %. Deaths in Ohio increased by nearly 20 %. Deaths in Ohio increased by nearly 20 %. So look folks, we need the wall we need.
So look folks we need the wall we need. So look folks we need the wall, we need to stop illegal immigration. We will stop to stop illegal immigration. We will stop to stop illegal immigration. We will stop it it it. We're not going to have drugs pouring. We're not going to have drugs pouring. We're not going to have drugs pouring into our country and destroying our - into our country and destroying our into our country.
And destroying our youth and others, by the way, we're gonna make our country strong. We're gonna make our country strong. We're gonna make our country strong again. We're gonna make our country rich again. We're gonna make our country rich again. We're gonna make our country rich again, we're gonna make our country great.
Again, we're gonna make our country great. Again, we're gonna make our country great. Again, we're not gonna let our jobs get again, we're not gonna let our jobs get. Again, we're not gonna let our jobs get taken away, taken away, taken away. I see Hillary Clinton the other day. I - I see Hillary Clinton the other day.
I - I see Hillary Clinton the other day, I don't like Donald Trump's temperament and I was thinking, you know, maybe I was and I was thinking, you know, maybe I was and I was thinking, you know, maybe I was thinking maybe I should say actually thinking maybe I should say actually thinking maybe I should say actually have a very nice temperament and I do.
I have a very nice temperament and I do. I have a very nice temperament and I do. I do I get along, I have great. Do I get along. I have great do I get along? I have great relationships. I have, I get along great relationships. I have - I get along great relationships. I have - I get along great, but you know what it's time in our - but you know what it's time in our - but you know what, it's time in our country that we had somebody with a country that we had somebody with a country that we had somebody With a strong temperament, I hate to say this strong temperament, I hate to say this strong temperament, I hate to say this, it's really time we're watching crime, it's really time we're watching crime, it's really time.
We're watching crime after crime problem after problem we're after crime problem after problem we're after crime problem after problem. We're watching all of the stuff that happens, watching all of the stuff that happens, watching all of the stuff that happens. We don't have victories anymore. We don't.
We don't have victories anymore, we don't - we don't have victories anymore. We don't win anymore. We used to win, you know when win anymore. We used to win, you know, when win anymore. We used to win. You know, when I was young, I was going to school. I - I was young, I was going to school I - I was young, I was going to school.
I always used to hear the United States always used to hear the United States always used to hear the United States never lost. We never lost. We never lost, never lost. We never lost. We never lost, never lost. We never lost. We never lost. We never lost a war. I guess things. We never lost a war. I guess things.
We never lost a war. I guess things didn't work out so great. There's always didn't work out so great. There's always didn't work out. So great. There's always problems, but we didn't lose Wars and problems, but we didn't lose Wars and problems, but we didn't lose Wars. And since like Vietnam, we don't win anymore since like Vietnam, we don't win anymore since like Vietnam, we don't win anymore and we don't even fight to win.
I said and we don't even fight to win, I said and we don't even fight to win. I said keep the oil, you're gonna leave Iraq, keep the oil, you're gonna leave Iraq, keep the oil, you're gonna leave Iraq, don't don't go into Iraq, but if you're don't, don't go into Iraq. But if you're don't, don't go into Iraq.
But if you're going into Iraq, keep the oil when you going into Iraq, keep the oil, when you going into Iraq, keep the oil, when you leave, I said it keep the oil, they don't leave. I said it keep the oil, they don't leave. I said it keep the oil, they don't listen and I said it loud, you all heard listen and I said it loud, you all heard listen and I said it loud, you all heard it for years.
I've been saying it well it for years. I've been saying it well it for years I've been saying it well, you know, who's got the oil. Now Iran is, you know, who's got the oil now Iran is, you know, who's got the oil now Iran is going to have it. Isis has it at least going to have it Isis, has it at least going to have it, Isis has it at least temporarily before they get blown away temporarily before they get blown away temporarily before they get blown away.
Now if I get in, they'll get blown away. Now if I get in, they'll get blown away. Now if I get in, they'll get blown away by me and you know, a friend of mine has a son and you know, a friend of mine has a son. And you know, a friend of mine has a son and he's been over in Iraq long time. And he's been over in Iraq long time and he's been over in Iraq long time actually.
And great person, great citizen actually and great person, great citizen actually and great person, great citizen of our country, a great Patriot and I of our country, a great Patriot. And I of our country, a great Patriot and I spoke to him not so long ago and I said spoke to him not so long ago and I said spoke to him not so long ago.
And I said how do you feel? He said mr. Trump, it's how do you feel - he said mr. Trump, it's how do you feel - he said mr. Trump, it's so discouraging when we're fighting so discouraging when we're fighting so discouraging when we're fighting enemy and even our so-called allies and enemy and even our So-called allies and enemy and even our so-called allies.
And he doesn't even know if they're our - he doesn't even know if they're our - he doesn't even know if they're our allies. We're giving them this incredible allies. We're giving them this incredible allies. We're giving them this incredible equipment and a shot gets fired in the equipment and a shot gets fired in the equipment and a shot gets fired in the air and they drop their rifles, they drop air and they drop their rifles, they drop air and they drop Their rifles, they drop their guns, they leave their Humvees that their guns, they leave their Humvees that their guns, they leave their Humvees that are all armor plated and they run for are all armor plated and they run for are all armor plated and they run for The hills and the enemy takes it over the hills and the enemy takes it over the hills and the enemy takes it over and we fight an enemy with better and we fight an enemy with better.
And we fight an enemy with better equipment that we have. Their equipment equipment that we have, their equipment equipment that we have, their equipment is newer and better than what we have is newer and better than what we have is newer and better than what we have. And it's very, very sad to see what's - and it's very, very sad to see what's - and it's very, very sad to see what's going on.
But I will tell you I want to going on, but I will tell you I want to going on. But I will tell you, I want to get back to rebuilding the United States, get back to rebuilding the United States, get back to rebuilding the United States, rebuilding the infrastructure, but before rebuilding the infrastructure, but before rebuilding the infrastructure.
But before we do that, we have to take care of the - we do that. We have to take care of the - we do that. We have to take care of the ISIS situation. And I'll tell you ISIS situation and I'll tell you ISIS situation and I'll tell you, they are spreading, they are spreading, they are spreading, they are spreading.
They are spreading. They are spreading like wildfire, like wildfire, like wildfire, Isis is spreading. Isis is getting - our Isis is spreading, Isis is getting - our Isis is spreading. Isis is getting our youth, getting people from various youth, getting people from various youth, getting people from various countries.
Many countries, they use the countries, many countries they use the countries, many countries they use the internet better than we do. They're internet better than we do. They're internet better than we do. They're converting people to join Isis and you converting people to join Isis and you converting people to join Isis.
And you know why, because these young know why? Because these young know why? Because these young impressionable people, they see what's impressionable people. They see what's impressionable people. They see what's going on and they see the way Isis is going on and they see the way Isis is going on and they see the way Isis is treating us and they say, wow, isn't that treating us and they say, wow, isn't that treating us.
And they say, wow, isn't that wonderful, that's who I want to be with wonderful. That's who I want to be with wonderful. That's who I want to be with. We have to - we have to do things where we have to - we have to do things where we have to - we have to do things where they don't feel so good about themselves.
They don't feel so good about themselves. They don't feel so good about themselves anymore. Folks, all right, we don't feel we anymore folks, all right. We don't feel we anymore folks, all right. We don't feel - we have - you look at the - you look at what have you look at the - you look at what have you look at the - you look at what happens, you remember when I got in some happens, you remember when I got in some happens.
You remember when I got in some trouble where I talked about trouble where I talked about trouble where I talked about waterboarding, they asked me a question waterboarding, they asked me a question waterboarding, they asked me a question. They started off. They - yes, Ted Cruz a. They started off, they - yes, Ted Cruz a, they started off.
They - yes, Ted Cruz, a question he rightfully didn't want to question. He rightfully didn't want to question. He rightfully didn't want to get into it and it was a little bit, you get into it and it was a little bit, you get into it and it was a little bit, you know, like don't ask me what don't ask me know like, don't ask me What don't ask me know like, don't ask me what don't ask me about waterboarding.
Well, they asked me about waterboarding. Well, they asked me about waterboarding. Well, they asked me the question I said, I'll answer that the question I said, I'll answer that. The question I said, I'll answer that question, they said, what do you think question they said, what do you think question they said, what do you think about waterboarding?
I said I like it a about waterboarding. I said I like it a about waterboarding. I said I like it a lot. I don't think it's tough enough. You know, you know we have an enemy that's know. You know, we have an enemy that's know. You know, we have an enemy that's chopping off people's heads, Christians, chopping off people's heads, Christians, chopping off people's heads, Christians in particular.
You know, if you were a in particular, you know, if you were a in particular, you know, if you were a Christian and I have tremendous Christian and I have tremendous Christian and I have tremendous evangelical support. I think you all know evangelical support. I think you all know evangelical support, I think you all know that, but if you were a Christian, if you that, but if you were a Christian if you that, but if you were a - Christian, if you were a Christian from Syria, it was one were a Christian from Syria, it was one were a Christian from Syria.
It was one of the hardest places in the world to - of the hardest places in the world to - of the hardest places in the world to come into the United States. In other come into the United States in other come into the United States. In other words, if you were a Christian from Syria, words, if you were a Christian from Syria, words if you were a Christian from Syria, very likely going to be just horribly very likely going to be just horribly very likely going to be just horribly treated, including The ultimate treatment treated, including the ultimate treatment treated, including the ultimate treatment which is having a head chapter it was - which is having a head chapter it was - which is having a head chapter.
It was one of the hardest things you could do. One of the hardest things you could do, one of the hardest things you could do was to get into the United States, if you was to get into the United States, if you was to get into the United States, if you were a Muslim from Syria, it Was one of - were a Muslim from Syria, it was one of - were a Muslim from Syria.
It was one of the easier places to come into the - the easier places to come into the - the easier places to come into the United States from. And I'm not saying United States from - and I'm not saying United States from - and I'm not saying one or the other, I'm saying how unfair one or the other, I'm saying how unfair one or the other, I'm saying how unfair is that?
How bad is that? So we have is that how bad is that. So we have is that how bad is that? So we have people chopping off heads and people chopping off heads and people chopping off heads and drowning 30, 40, 50 people at a time in drowning, 30, 40, 50 people at a time in drowning 30, 40, 50 people at a time in steel cages, right?
Nobody's ever seen steel cages, right? Nobody's ever seen steel cages, right? Nobody's ever seen this before this before this before. This is like from the Middle Ages, this - this is like from the Middle Ages, this - this is like from the Middle Ages. This is nobody seen this when you see a few is nobody seen this when you see a few is nobody seen this when you see a few years ago, it began right with a years ago.
It began right with a years ago. It began right with a wonderful young man whose parents, I know wonderful young man whose parents, I know wonderful young man whose parents, I know it began and nobody saw that. It began and nobody saw that it began and nobody saw that. You know, you didn't - people get shot.
You know, you didn't. People get shot. You know, you didn't. People get shot, people get wounded, people get hurt. It's people get wounded, people get hurt. It's people get wounded, people get hurt, it's war, but nobody saw the chopping off of war, but nobody saw the chopping off of war, but nobody saw the chopping off of heads and now you see 40 and 50 at a heads and now you see 40 and 50 at a heads and now you see 40 and 50 at a time on the beach in the - in the orange time on the beach in the - in the orange time on the beach in the - in the orange uniforms.
And you see things happening, uniforms and you see things happening, uniforms and you see things happening that you haven't seen it that's like that. You haven't seen it that's like that. You haven't seen it. That's like medieval times. We're living in medieval medieval times. We're living in medieval, medieval times.
We're living in medieval times. We have to stop it. We have to be times, we have to stop it. We have to be times, we have to stop it. We have to be so strong. We have to fight. So viciously so strong we have to fight. So viciously so strong, we have to fight so viciously and violently because we're dealing with and violently because we're dealing with and violently because we're dealing with violent people, vision, violent people, vision, violent people vision.
When I made this apron and you know we - when I made this apron and you know we - when I made this apron and you know we have laws to uphold, we have laws, they have laws to uphold. We have laws, they have laws to uphold. We have laws, they don't have laws, you think they go back, don't have laws, you think they go back, don't have laws, you think they go back.
Look, we have loss and the Lord say you look, we have loss and the Lord say you look, we have loss and the Lord say you can't do this, you can't do that. You can't do this. You can't do that. You can't do this. You can't do that. You can't do them a lot, all right? They'll can't do them a lot, all right?
They'll can't do them a lot. All right, they'll all say you can do anything you want and all say you can do anything you want and all say you can do anything you want and the more vicious you are, the better. So the more vicious you are, the better. So the more vicious you are, the better. So we can't do waterboarding, which is - it's - we can't do waterboarding, which is - it's - we can't do waterboarding, which is - it's not the nicest thing, but it's peanuts, not the nicest thing, but it's peanuts, not the nicest thing, but it's peanuts compared to many alternatives, right?
So compared to many alternatives, right, so compared to many alternatives, right? So we can't do waterboarding, but they can - we can't do waterboarding, but they can - we can't do waterboarding, but they can do chopping off heads, drowning people in, do chopping off heads, drowning people in, do chopping off heads, drowning people in steel cages.
They can do whatever they steel cages they can do whatever they steel cages, they can do whatever they want to do and you know they eat dinner, want to do and you know they eat dinner, want to do and you know they eat dinner like us. Can you imagine them sitting like us, can you imagine them sitting like us?
Can you imagine them sitting around the table or wherever they're around the table or wherever they're around the table or wherever they're eating their dinner, talking about the eating, their dinner, talking about the eating, their dinner, talking about the Americans don't do waterboarding and yet Americans don't Do waterboarding and yet Americans don't do waterboarding and yet we chop off heads.
They probably think we chop off heads. They probably think we chop off heads. They probably think we're weak. We're stupid. We don't know. We're weak, we're stupid. We don't know. We're weak. We're stupid. We don't know what we're doing. We have no leadership what we're doing. We have no leadership. What we're doing.
We have no leadership. You know, you have to fight fire with, you know, you have to fight fire with, you know, you have to fight fire with fire. We have people out there, we have people out there who are - so we have people out there who are - so we have people out there who are so vicious and smart so vicious and they vicious and smart so vicious and they vicious and smart so vicious.
And they really don't know what it is to be really don't know what it is to be really don't know what it is to be beaten. They probably don't even beaten, they probably don't even beaten, they probably don't even understand, it's probably thirty thirty understand it's probably thirty thirty understand it's probably thirty thirty five thousand people and they don't five thousand people and they don't five thousand people and they don't understand themselves.
They're beating - understand themselves, they're beating - understand themselves. They're beating the United States of America and they're the United States of America and they're the United States of America and they're making things impossible. They're making things impossible. They're making things impossible.
They're knocking out airplanes. They're doing knocking out airplanes, they're doing knocking out airplanes, they're doing things that are incredible. They probably things that are incredible. They probably things that are incredible. They probably don't understand themselves how they're don't understand themselves, how they're don't understand themselves, how they're getting away with it.
Well, let me just getting away with it. Well, let me just getting away with it. Well, let me just tell you something. If I'm president, tell you something, if I'm president, tell you something, if I'm president, they're not gonna get away with it, they're not gonna get away with it. They're not gonna get away with it.
Now people like Hillary Clinton will say now people like Hillary Clinton will say now people like Hillary Clinton will say, oh, he's temperament. I know at one point - oh, he's temperament. I know at one point - oh, he's temperament. I know at one point you say, I don't like his tone folks, you say, I don't like his tone folks, you say, I don't like his tone folks, folks.
I have a very nice tone. Look, I'm a folks, I have a very nice tone. Look, I'm a folks, I have a very nice tone. Look, I'm a nice person. I'm a nice person now by the nice person. I'm a nice person now by the nice person. I'm a nice person now by the way, the migration you see what's way the migration.
You see what's way the migration, you see what's happening. They're not coming into our happening. They're not coming into our happening. They're not coming into our country anymore just so you understand country anymore. Just so you understand country anymore. Just so you understand, we're not allowing thousands and we're not allowing thousands and we're not allowing thousands and thousands of people are being brought.
Thousands of people are being brought - thousands of people are being brought into our country. There's no into our country, there's no into our country, there's no documentation. There's no paperwork documentation. There's no paperwork documentation. There's no paperwork. Hillary Clinton wants to raise Obama's.
Hillary Clinton wants to raise Obama's. Hillary Clinton wants to raise Obama's number by five hundred and fifty percent number by five hundred and fifty percent number by five hundred and fifty percent. You know it's very interesting because I - you know it's very interesting because I - you know it's very interesting because I would say five hundred percent they said would say five hundred percent.
They said would say five hundred percent. They said Donald Trump is wrong. The media by the Donald Trump is wrong. The media by the Donald Trump is wrong. The media by the way, the most dishonest human beings in way the most dishonest human beings in way the most dishonest human beings in the entire world.
You know, I had a poll the entire world, you know, I had a poll the entire world, you know I had a poll the other day from one of the most the other day from one of the most the other day from one of the most dishonest Newspapers, I've ever seen The dishonest newspapers I've ever seen The dishonest newspapers I've ever seen The Washington Post.
They listened totally Washington Post. They listened totally Washington Post. They listened totally two sons. They polled far more Democrats, two sons. They polled far more Democrats, two sons. They polled far more Democrats than Republicans. Amit, what kind of a than Republicans, Amit, what kind of a than Republicans, Amit, what kind of a publicist and even people that were on publicist and even people that were on publicist and even people that were on the other side said that's not a very - the Other side said that's not a very - the other side said that's not a very good polls, but you know today in the good polls, but you know today in the good polls, but you know today in the Wall Street Journal, I think today when Wall Street Journal I think today when Wall Street Journal, I think today, when everybody's running, I believe there was - everybody's running, I believe there was - everybody's running, I believe there was a one-point spread.
Now think of this a one-point spread. Now think of this a one-point spread. Now think of this, I've spent no money and we're raising a - I've spent no money and we're raising a - I've spent no money and we're raising a lot of money. We're raising a lot of lot of money. We're raising a lot of lot of money.
We're raising a lot of money, doesn't mean we have to spend it money, doesn't mean we have to spend it money, doesn't mean we have to spend it now, but we're raising a lot of money now. But we're raising a lot of money now. But we're raising a lot of money, people gonna be very impressed, but I've people gonna be very impressed, but I've people gonna be very impressed.
But I've spent no money, literally nothing. I spent, spent no money, literally nothing. I spent - spent no money, literally nothing I spent I think nothing on ads. Hillary, I heard I think nothing on ads. Hillary, I heard I think nothing on ads, Hillary, I heard 68 million, I heard 78 million, I heard 68 million, I heard 78 million.
I heard 68 million, I heard 78 million, I heard almost a hundred million, I heard these almost a hundred million, I heard these almost a hundred million. I heard these numbers you know, negative ads which are numbers you know, negative ads which are numbers you know, negative ads which are largely on trial, give you an example, my largely on trial give you an example, my largely on trial give you an example.
My son Eric Trump and Don Trump is your son Eric Trump and Don Trump is your son Eric Trump and Don Trump. Is your ways done come on, get down, got ta get ways done, come on, get down, got ta get ways done, come on, get down, got ta get, got ta get our boys out doing a good job, no pressure, right? No pressure, no pressure, right?
No pressure. No pressure, right, no pressure. Well, yeah, thank you guys very much. Just well, yeah, thank you guys very much. Just well, yeah, thank you guys very much. Just listening and getting the opportunity listening and getting the opportunity listening and getting the opportunity, the amazing opportunity to go all around the amazing opportunity to go all around the amazing opportunity to go all around the country following my father on this, the country following my father On this, the country following my father on this amazing journey and it's - it's been amazing journey and it's - it's been amazing journey and it's - it's been incredible, it truly - it's no longer a incredible it truly - it's no longer a incredible it truly - it's no longer a campaign.
It's a mandate from the people campaign, it's a mandate from the people campaign. It's a mandate from the people to do something different. It's a - to do something different. It's a to do something different. It's a movement and I want to thank you for all movement. And I want to thank you for all movement and I want to thank you for all the incredible support that you guys, the incredible support that you guys, the incredible support that you guys have given him for giving you guys a have given him for giving you Guys, a have given him for giving you guys a voice, and that's what it is.
He's finally voice. And that's what it is. He's finally voice. And that's what it is. He's finally giving the hard-working people of this, giving the hard-working people of this, giving the hard-working people of this country who have been left in the dust country who have been left in the dust country, who have been left in the dust.
The people who have been forgotten about the people who have been forgotten about the people who have been forgotten about by the Washington elites, he's giving you by the Washington elites he's giving you by the Washington elites. He's giving you all a voice again because your voice all a voice again because your voice all a voice, again because your voice matters, your voice is what built this matters.
Your voice is what built this matters. Your voice is what built this country, your hard work. And efforts are country your hard work and efforts are country, your hard work and efforts are what made this country, what it is and what made this country, what it is and what made this country, what it is. And we're gonna make sure that you have the - we're gonna make sure that you have the - we're gonna make sure that you have the ability to have that voice again.
So ability to have that voice again. So ability to have that voice again. So thank you so much for letting me be a thank you so much for letting me be a thank you so much for letting me be a just a small part of this incredible, just a small part of this incredible, just a small part of this incredible Mission because it is just that and mission because it is just that and mission because it is just that and we're gonna make you proud.
Thank you. We're gonna make you proud. Thank you. We're gonna make you proud. Thank you. Thank you John. Thank you. So she's spending money like life I've. So she's spending money like life I've. So she's spending money like life I've never seen before, never seen before, never seen before. And I figured what start spending it and I figured what start spending it and I figured what start spending it after the convention, which is going to after the convention which is going to after the convention, which is going to be a tremendous success, be a tremendous Success be a tremendous success for convention, so many people want to for convention, so many people want to for convention, so many people want to speak.
So we're gonna see something I speak. So we're gonna see something I speak. So we're gonna see something. I think we're gonna have some - we're gonna think we're gonna have some - we're gonna think we're gonna have some - we're gonna have a great time. More importantly, we're have a great time. More importantly, we're have a great time.
More importantly, we're gonna say exactly what we're going to do gonna say exactly what we're going to do gonna say exactly what we're going to do, but what happened. So I said you know we - but what happened. So I said you know we - but what happened so I said you know we have to support our children, do we agree, have to support our children?
Do we agree? Have to support our children? Do we agree? Right? We all have great children. We have right. We all have great children, we have right, we all have great children, we have to support it. So I bought something in to support it. So I bought something in to support it. So I bought something in Scotland, Turnberry, one of the great Scotland Turnberry, one of the great Scotland Turnberry, one of the great resorts of the world and my son, Eric resorts of the world and my son, Eric resorts of the world and my son, Eric Trump, who You've seen on television, but Trump who you've seen on television but Trump who you've seen on television, but he's worked very hard on getting it done.
He's worked very hard on getting it done. He's worked very hard on getting it done and getting it. We rebuilt it on budget and getting it. We rebuilt it on budget and getting it. We rebuilt it on budget. Remember then on budget ahead of remember then on budget ahead of remember then on budget, ahead of schedule.
How good is that right wouldn't schedule how good is that right wouldn't schedule how good is that right? Wouldn't that be nice that be nice that be nice, I could even say under budget, but I - I could even say under budget. But I - I could even say under budget, but I decided to use marble instead of decided to use marble instead of decided to use marble instead of linoleum right on budget and ahead of linoleum right on budget and ahead of linoleum right on budget and ahead of Schedule by a lot, so we had a grand schedule by a lot.
So we had a grand schedule by a lot. So we had a grand opening and I said to myself, I have to opening and I said to myself, I have to opening and I said to myself, I have to go and support my son. I have to go see, go and support my son. I have to go see, go and support my son. I have to go see it even though I'm on the campaign trail it, even though I'm on the campaign trail it, even though I'm on the campaign trail and the fair press will say he's there and the fair press will say he's there and the fair press Will say he's there for one day to support now I'm going to for one day to support now I'm going to for one day to support.
Now I'm going to Europe, Scotland for one day I left here, Europe, Scotland for one day. I left here Europe, Scotland for one day. I left here. I spent one night and then I left the - I spent one night and then I left the - I spent one night and then I left the following day, right, because I was there following day, right?
Because I was there following day, right, because I was there to cut the ribbon with my son because we to cut the ribbon with my son because we to cut the ribbon with my son because we owe that to our children. And one of the owe that to our children and one of the owe that to our children and one of the things they tell fathers is we got into him.
So a couple of things we got into him. So a couple of things we got into him. So a couple of things, you know, they're talking about the pound, you know, they're talking about the pound, you know, they're talking about the pound and I give him an answer of the pound and I give him an answer of the pound and I give him an Answer of the pound that ends up in a commercial, somebody that ends up in a commercial, somebody that ends up in a commercial, somebody asked me about the pound, I give him an asked me about the pound.
I give him an asked me about the pound. I give him an answer. The pound answer the pound answer the pound sounds like I care about the pan know. I sounds like I care about the pan know. I sounds like I care about the pan know I care about our country, but here's really care about our country. But here's really care about our country.
But here's really what they did that was - that was amazing what they did that was - that was amazing what they did that was - that was amazing. I said to everybody because I played - I said to everybody because I played, I said to everybody because I played very little golf over the last year, very little golf over the last year, very little golf over the last year.
Believe me very little. Unlike our - believe me very little, unlike our - believe me very little, unlike our president who's playing like a PGA Tour, president who's playing like a PGA Tour president who's playing like a PGA Tour schedule, I think he plays more golf than schedule. I think he plays more golf than schedule.
I think he plays more golf than the players on the PGA Tour, okay? But I - the players on the PGA Tour, okay. But I - the players on the PGA Tour, okay. But I said to my people said to my people said to my people, I'm going to go - I'm going to support my - I'm going to go - I'm going to support my - I'm going to go - I'm going to support my son, I'm leaving.
I do not want to play son, I'm leaving. I do not want to play son, I'm leaving. I do not want to play golf as much as I want to play Turnberry golf as much as I want to play Turnberry golf as much as I want to play Turnberry. I do not want to play golf. I do not want - I do not want to play golf, I do not want - I do not want to play golf.
I do not want to hold a golf club because I do not to hold a golf club because I do not to hold a golf club because I do not want to see the dishonest media portray want to see the dishonest media portray, want to see the Dishonest media portray me as somebody that was going over to me as somebody that was going over to me as somebody that was going over to play.
Golf, okay, play golf, okay, play golf, okay, in the middle of a campaign. But I wanted in the middle of a campaign, but I wanted in the middle of a campaign, but I wanted to support my son, Eric. And by the way he to support my son, Eric. And by the way he to support my son, Eric. And by the way, he did an A job, it was great.
So I go over, did an A job, it was great. So I go over, did an A job, it was great. So I go over, we have a news conference. We do a - we have a news conference. We do a - we have a news conference. We do a ribbon-cutting. I stopped at another ribbon-cutting. I stopped at another ribbon-cutting. I stopped at another place for a little while.
The next board place for a little while. The next board place for a little while, the next board, the next day I leave, I literally spent the next day I leave. I literally spent the next day I leave. I literally spent one night in Europe, not too many people one night in Europe, not too many people one night in Europe, not too many.
People do that. You go to Europe long flight, you do that, you go to Europe long flight, you do that. You go to Europe, long flight, you come back, I was back on Saturday evening come back. I was back on Saturday evening come back. I was back on Saturday evening that you know because the times a lot that you know because the times a lot that you know because the times a lot different, I think I left on Thursday different, I think I left on Thursday, different I think I left On Thursday, Friday, I think I left on Friday, I got Friday, I think I left on Friday, I got Friday, I think I left on Friday.
I got back on Saturday some weird thing, but I back on Saturday some weird thing. But I back on Saturday, some weird thing, but I was here forever. So Hillary unis got all was here forever. So Hillary unis got all was here forever. So Hillary unis got all this money from Wall Street. So she takes this money from Wall Street.
So she takes this money from Wall Street, so she takes Ackerson. You have to understand, I didn't Ackerson you have to understand, I didn't Ackerson you have to understand, I didn't touch a club. I didn't hit - I didn't go touch a club. I didn't hit. I didn't go touch a club, I didn't hit. I didn't go play, I would have loved to, but I didn't play.
I would have loved to, but I didn't play, I would have loved to, but I didn't know time, but I didn't want the image a know time, but I didn't want the image a know time, but I didn't want the image a plan. So she takes a commercial and she plan, so she takes a commercial and she plan. So she takes a commercial and she has me swinging not a bad swing by the - has me swinging not a bad swing by the - has me swinging, not a bad swing by the way that was a good thing.
They should way - that was a good thing. They should way - that was a good thing. They should have at least shown me with a bad swing, have at least shown me with a bad swing, have at least shown me with a bad swing. But they did. You see the commercial, but they did. You see the commercial, but they did.
You see the commercial where I'm hitting a golf ball well that where I'm hitting a golf ball well that where I'm hitting a golf ball well that was two years before that was taken at a - was two years before that was taken at a - was two years Before that was taken at a different place, so darkness, she's different place.
So darkness, she's different place. So darkness, she's crooked, that's why we call a crooked crooked. That's why we call a crooked crooked. That's why we call a crooked. Hello. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. I didn't say now. Think of it. So here I - I didn't say now think of it.
So here I - I didn't say now think of it. So here I tell my people, I do not want to touch a tell my people. I do not want to touch a - tell my people, I do not want to touch a goth flip. I will not play and I'm in a goth flip. I will not play and I'm in a goth flip. I will not play and I'm in a commercial hitting a golf ball, but the commercial hitting a golf ball, but the commercial hitting a golf ball.
But the picture was taken from two years before. Picture was taken from two years before. Picture was taken from two years before it is such a disgrace what goes on in it is such a disgrace what goes on in it is such a disgrace what goes on in the world of politics, the dishonesty, the, the world of politics, the dishonesty the, the World of politics, the dishonesty, the deception, it is such a total disgrace deception.
It is such a total disgrace deception. It is such a total disgrace we're gonna straight to their phones. We're gonna straight to their phones. We're gonna straight to their phones. We're gonna straight that down and let we're gonna straight that down and let we're gonna straight that down. And let me tell you, Hillary Clinton is owned by me, tell you, Hillary Clinton is owned by me.
Tell you, Hillary Clinton is owned by Wall Street. She's owned by many people, Wall Street, she's owned by many people, Wall Street. She's owned by many people. All of the money like she wants to take all of the money like she wants to take all of the money like she wants to take these commercient tens of millions of these commercient tens of millions of these commercient tens of millions of dollars already.
How about this, she dollars already, how about this? She dollars already, how about this? She spends millions and millions and spends millions and millions and spends millions and millions and millions of dollars already on me, right? Millions of dollars already on me, right, millions of dollars already.
On me, right, because you know everyone is pouring in because you know everyone is pouring in because you know everyone is pouring in because of mostly because of influence because of mostly because of influence because of mostly because of influence cuz. They want influence with me. They cuz they want influence with me, they cuz, they want influence with me.
They know they don't have too much influence. Know they don't have too much influence. Know they don't have too much influence. You know what I'm doing well in the - you know, what I'm doing. Well, in the - you know what I'm doing well, in the small donations, where do you see the small donations? Where do you see the small donations?
Where do you see the small donations? But I'm doing great, small donations, but I'm doing great, small donations, but I'm doing great Donald J Trump the small donations, but Donald J Trump the small donations. But Donald J Trump the small donations but - but Hillary is never gonna bring you. But Hillary is never gonna bring you, but Hillary is never gonna bring you jobs back, folks, jobs, back, folks, jobs back folks.
He's never gonna bring your job self. He's never gonna bring your job self. He's never gonna bring your job self. Again, married to the man that signed again married to the man that signed again married to the man that signed NAFTA, one of the old-time worst, right NAFTA, one of the old-time worst, right NAFTA, one of the old-time worst, right?
She's not bringing you jobs back. She's not bringing you jobs back. She's not bringing you jobs back. She doesn't even know about bringing - she doesn't even know about bringing, she doesn't even know about bringing jobs. And I'll be honest with you, she's jobs, and I'll be honest with you, she's jobs, and I'll be honest with you, she's so overrated.
So overrated so overrated. She's so totally overrated if if she - she's so totally overrated, if if she - she's so totally overrated. If if she wanted to bring your jobs back, she wanted to bring your jobs back. She wanted to bring your jobs back. She couldn't if she wanted to, if she really couldn't, if she wanted to, if she really couldn't, if she wanted to, if she really tried.
And really, really wanted to forget, tried and really, really wanted to forget, tried and really, really wanted to forget the fact that she's bought and owned by the fact that she's bought and owned by the fact that she's bought and owned by so many different people. If she really so many different people, if she really so many different people, if she really wanted to bring those jobs back, wanted to bring those jobs back, wanted to bring those jobs back.
She's so overrated, she couldn't do it. She's so overrated, she couldn't do it. She's so overrated, she couldn't do it anyway. So let me just tell you, I just - anyway. So let me just tell you, I just - anyway. So let me just tell you, I just did this in a big speech and I have to did this in a big speech and I have to did this in a big speech and I have to read it because I liked it.
I think it's read it because I liked it. I think it's read it because I liked it. I think it's, you know, seven steps. We like it. It's you know, seven steps. We like it. It's you know, seven steps. We like it. It's gonna happen fast. If I win, if I win gonna happen fast, if I win, if I win gonna happen fast, if I win, if I win where and where, where and where, where and where?
Thank you. But I'm going to withdraw the thank you. But I'm going to withdraw the thank you. But I'm going to withdraw the United States from the trans-pacific United States, from the trans-pacific United States from the trans-pacific partnership, which has not yet been run partnership, which has not yet been run partnership, which has not yet been run.
So the trans-pacific partnership is - so the trans-pacific partnership is - so the trans-pacific partnership is another disaster done and pushed by another disaster done and pushed by another disaster done and pushed by special interests who want to rape our special interests who want to rape our special interests, Who want to rape our country just a continuing rape of our country, just a continuing rape of our country, just a continuing rape of our country.
That's what it is though. It's a country that's what it is though. It's a country that's what it is though. It's a harsh word, it's a rape of our country, harsh word, it's a rape of our country, harsh word, it's a rape of our country. This is done by wealthy people that want this is done by wealthy people that want this is done by wealthy people that want to take advantage of us and that want to, to take advantage of us and that want to, to take advantage of us and that Want to sign another partnership, so Hillary sign another partnership.
So Hillary sign another partnership. So Hillary Clinton not so long ago said this is the Clinton not so long ago said this is the Clinton not so long ago said this is the gold standard of trade pacts. The gold gold standard of trade pacts, the gold gold standard of trade pacts the gold standard and she's down and say this is standard and she's down and say this is standard and she's down and say this is the gold standard.
In fact, I saw it on the gold standard. In fact, I saw it on the gold standard. In fact, I saw it on television this morning. The gold television this morning, the gold television this morning, the gold standard. Then when I got involved and I standard then when I got involved and I standard then when I got involved and I started pointing out, all the flaws started pointing out.
All the flaws started pointing out all the flaws, especially the fact that monetary, especially the fact that monetary, especially the fact that monetary manipulation, currency manipulation, which manipulation, currency manipulation, which manipulation, currency manipulation, which is a primary tool. That other countries is a primary tool.
That other countries is a primary tool that other countries use especially China to destroy our use, especially China, to destroy our use, especially China, to destroy our companies and to take our business, okay, companies and to take our business, okay, companies and to take our business, okay? It's not properly addressed and it's not properly addressed and it's not properly addressed and practically not even discussed at all in practically not even discussed at all in practically not even discussed at all in this.
That's not the only reason there this that's not the only reason there this that's not the only reason. There are many reasons. Number one, I want to are many reasons. Number one, I want to are many reasons. Number one, I want to make individual deals with individual make individual deals with individual make individual deals with individual countries.
I don't need to have massive countries. I don't need to have massive countries. I don't need to have massive that you can't get out of 6,000 pages that you can't get out of 6,000 pages that you can't get out of 6,000 pages. Our people probably never even read it. Our people probably never even read it.
Our people probably never even read it and these other countries they know and these other countries they know and these other countries, they know every word, every comma, every paragraph, every word, every comma, every paragraph, every word, every comma, every paragraph, every sentence and our people.
I just - every sentence and our people, I just - every sentence and our people, I just know our people, I remember with know our people. I remember with know our people, I remember with Obamacare, remember they went to all the Obamacare. Remember, they went to all the Obamacare. Remember they went to all the congressmen, no, no.
Remember we got to congressmen. No, no. Remember we got to congressmen. No, no. Remember we got to repeal it and replace it, don't worry to repeal it and replace it, don't worry to repeal it and replace it. Don't worry to disaster disaster disaster, but you remember when they talk to, but you remember when they talk to, but you remember when they talk to people about who read it and it's people about who read it and it's people about who read it and it's missing.
Its met thousands of pages who missing its met thousands of pages who missing its met thousands of pages who read it. Nobody, nobody it was that Freud read it, nobody, nobody. It was that Freud read it, nobody, nobody. It was that Freud. That said, he de frauded, all the people that said he de frauded, all the people that said he de frauded, all the people you remember the guy, everybody forgot you remember the guy, everybody forgot you remember the guy, everybody forgot about him, the one that wrote it And then about him the one that wrote it and then about him the one that wrote it.
And then he had a moment of jolliness where he - he had a moment of jolliness where he he had a moment of jolliness where he thought he was with friends or something. Thought he was with friends or something thought he was with friends or something and he started saying what a joke. But we - and he started saying what a joke.
But we - and he started saying what a joke. But we have a trans-pacific partnership that have a trans-pacific partnership that have a trans-pacific partnership that Hillary Clinton will sign 100 %, okay, 100 %. Hillary Clinton will sign 100 %, okay, 100 %. Hillary Clinton will sign 100 %, okay, 100 %. But because of me, but because of me, but because of me just like I shamed her into using the - just like I shamed her into using the - just like I shamed her into using the term radical Islamic terrorism numbers, term, radical Islamic terrorism numbers, term, radical Islamic Terrorism numbers who wouldn't use it because Obama who wouldn't use it because Obama who wouldn't use it because Obama wouldn't use it and she didn't want that wouldn't use it and she didn't want that wouldn't use it and she didn't want that.
She does not want to do anything to - she does not want to do anything to. She does not want to do anything to defend him or offend him if she offends defend him or offend him if she offends defend him or offend him if she offends Obama too risky for her. Okay, Obama too risky for her, okay, Obama too risky for her.
Okay, so she doesn't want to do that, so she'll - so she doesn't want to do that. So she'll - so she doesn't want to do that. So she'll use the term now because I shamed her use the term now because I shamed her use the term now because I shamed her into it. Well, I shamed her into turning into it. Well, I shamed her into turning into it.
Well, I shamed her into turning against the so-called gold standard. It's against the so-called gold standard. It's against the so-called gold standard. It's not the gold standard. It's going to be not the gold standard. It's going to be not the gold standard. It's going to be worse than after folks it's gonna suck worse than after folks it's gonna suck worse than after folks.
It's gonna suck your jobs and your industry away what we - your jobs and your industry away, what we - your jobs and your industry away, what we have left of it, it's a disaster, so just have left of it. It's a disaster. So just have left of it, it's a disaster. So just remember that she will sign it 100 %. She remember that she will sign it 100 %. She remember that she will sign it 100 %, she wanted it.
She considered the greatest wanted it. She considered the greatest wanted it. She considered the greatest, then she said, oh, no, I'm not going to then she said, oh, no, I'm not going to then she said, oh, no, I'm not going to sign it, but she'll sign it. She'll make a sign it. But she'll sign it, she'll make a sign it, but she'll sign it.
She'll make a couple of little amendments that don't - couple of little amendments that don't - couple of little amendments that don't mean anything, then she'll sign it and mean anything then she'll sign it. And mean anything, then she'll sign it and there goes the rest of our jobs, I'm there goes the rest of our jobs.
I'm there goes the rest of our jobs. I'm going to appoint the toughest and going to appoint the toughest and going to appoint the toughest. And smartest trade negotiators to fight on smartest trade negotiators to fight on smartest trade negotiators to fight on behalf of the American workers, okay? Gon na do it, we have the best.
We have the gonna do it. We have the best, we have the gonna do it. We have the best, we have the best in the world. We use political acts best in the world. We use political acts best in the world. We use political acts to make the biggest deals ever bigger to make the biggest deals ever bigger to make the biggest deals ever bigger than company deals.
When you see IBM and than company deals, when you see IBM and than company deals, when you see IBM and all of these companies making deals, this - all of these companies making deals, this - all of these companies making deals, this stuff is much bigger and we have Stuff is much bigger and we have stuff is much bigger and we have political hacks representing us.
I'm political hacks representing us, I'm political hacks representing us. I'm going to direct the Secretary of going to direct the Secretary of going to direct the Secretary of Commerce immediately to identify every Commerce immediately to identify every Commerce immediately to identify every violation or trade agreement.
Every trade violation or trade agreement, every trade violation or trade agreement, every trade agreement that's been violated, which is agreement that's been violated, which is agreement that's been violated, which is about all of them. I'm going to have them about all of them. I'm going to have them about all of them.
I'm going to have them every single trade agreement of a every single trade agreement of a - every single trade agreement of a foreign country is currently using and foreign country is currently using and foreign country is currently using. And harming our workers, what we're doing is harming our workers.
What we're doing is harming our workers. What we're doing is we have trade agreements that truly are - we have trade agreements that truly are - we have trade agreements that truly are so one-sided that they are now harming so one-sided that they are now harming. So one-sided that they are now harming and really hurting our workers, then I'm and really hurting our workers then I'm and really hurting our workers, then I'm going to direct totally direct them to going to direct totally direct them to going to direct totally direct them to Go after these to file complaints, you go after these to file complaints, you go after these to file complaints.
You know there's a way with the appropriate know there's a way with the appropriate know there's a way with the appropriate agencies and use every tool. And we have agencies and use every tool and we have agencies and use every tool and we have many of them, but we don't use them and many of them. But we don't use them and many of them.
But we don't use them. And the reason we don't use them special, the reason we don't use them special, the reason we don't use them special interest on what it is under the interest on what it is under the interest on what it is under the American international law. To end these American international law to end these American international law to end these abuses of these trade agreements, it'll abuses of these trade agreements.
It'll abuses of these trade agreements. It'll end folks, believe me, and it'll end fast. This is what Ohio's gonna like a lot, I'm - this is what Ohio's gonna like a lot. I'm - this is what Ohio's gonna like a lot. I'm going to tell our NAFTA partners that I going to tell our NAFTA partners that I going to tell our NAFTA partners that I intend to immediately renegotiate the - intend to immediately renegotiate the intend to immediately renegotiate the terms of that agreement to get a better terms Of that agreement to get a better terms of that agreement to get a better deal for our workers and I don't mean deal for our workers and I don't mean deal for our workers and I don't mean just a little bit better.
I mean so much just a little bit better, I mean so much just a little bit better, I mean so much better that you will not even believe it better that you will not even believe it better that you will not even believe it. Okay. Then I'm going to submit a notice, okay? Then I'm going to submit a notice, okay?
Then I'm going to submit a notice under Article 22:05 of the NAFTA under Article 22:05 of the NAFTA under Article 22:05 of the NAFTA agreement. That American tends to agreement that American tends to agreement that American tends to withdraw from the deal if they don't withdraw from the deal if they don't withdraw from the deal if they don't come through for us.
So we'll withdraw if come through for us. So we'll withdraw if come through for us. So we'll withdraw. If they don't make the deal, I'm going to - they don't make the deal, I'm going to - they don't make the deal. I'm going to instruct my Treasury secretary who will instruct my Treasury secretary who will instruct my Treasury secretary who will be a very good one.
I already have an be a very good one. I already have an be a very good one. I already have an idea who it's gonna be idea who it's gonna be idea who it's gonna be to label China, a currency manipulator to label China, a currency manipulator to label China, a currency manipulator. Now I've been saying this for years now, I've been saying this for years now, I've been saying this for years, everybody knows that's what they're - everybody knows that's what they're - everybody knows that's what they're doing.
We make better product than they doing. We make better product than they doing. We make better product than they do, but we never get a chance to show it do, but we never get a chance to show it do. But we never get a chance to show it because they manipulate their currencies because they manipulate their currencies because they manipulate their currencies, their grand chess masters folks and we - their grand chess masters folks and we - their grand chess masters folks and we do nothing about it.
I'm not even sure if do nothing about it. I'm not even sure if do nothing about it. I'm not even sure if our country knows what's going on. I'll - our country knows what's going on. I'll - our country knows what's going on, I'll be honest. But the reason we do nothing be honest, but the reason we do nothing be honest, but the reason we do nothing is because of the special interest of - is because of the special interest of - is because of the special interest of lobbyists.
They have our people, totally lobbyists. They have our people, totally lobbyists. They have our people totally taken care of any country that devalues, taken care of any country that devalues, taken care of any country that devalues their currency in order to take their currency in order to take their currency in order to take advantage of the United States.
And its advantage of the United States and its advantage of the United States and its workers will be met very, very sharply. Workers will be met very, very sharply. Workers will be met very, very sharply and that includes tariffs and taxes for and that includes tariffs and taxes for and that includes tariffs and taxes for their goods coming into the country, okay, number six got to do it.
Why wouldn't we - number six got to do it, why wouldn't we number six got to do it? Why wouldn't we do it? Why wouldn't we do it? And I'm a do it, why wouldn't we do it and I'm a do it, why wouldn't we do it? And I'm a free trader just so you understand, but free trader, just so you understand, but free trader, just so you understand, but we're being taken advantage of by - we're being taken advantage of by - we're being taken advantage of by everybody get it, do it every time.
China, everybody get it, do it every time. China, everybody get it, do it every time. China, you know they go seven percent, eight, you know they go seven percent, eight, you know they go seven percent, eight percent and it's like a disaster percent and it's like a disaster percent and it's like a disaster.
You know, we have with GDP, we have right, you know, we have with GDP, we have right, you know, we have with GDP, we have right now right now zero, a little more than now right now, zero, a little more than now right now, zero, a little More than zero, if China goes to seven percent, it's zero. If China goes to seven percent, it's zero.
If China goes to seven percent, it's like a national catastrophe like a national catastrophe like a national catastrophe. We're like the dummies, we're gonna be up. We're like the dummies, we're gonna be up. We're like the dummies, we're gonna be up to a very high level and we're gonna be to a very high level and we're gonna be to a very high level and we're gonna be up to that level fairly soon.
If I win up to that level fairly soon, if I win up to that level fairly soon, if I win, believe me, I'm going to instruct the - believe me, I'm going to instruct the - believe me, I'm going to instruct the United States Trade representatives to United States Trade representatives to United States Trade representatives to bring trade cases against China, both in bring trade cases against China, both in bring trade cases against China, both in this country and at the World Trade this country and at the World Trade this country and at the World Trade Organization where you're allowed to do Organization where you're allowed to do Organization where you're allowed to do it, we never do it it.
We never do it it. We never do it. We're being manhandled and we never do. We're being manhandled and we never do. We're being manhandled and we never do anything now. It's not only China, it's anything now, it's not only China, it's anything now, it's not only China, it's everyone. China is the number one abuser everyone.
China is the number one abuser everyone. China is the number one abuser. But it's everyone China's unfair subsidy, but it's everyone China's unfair subsidy, but it's everyone China's unfair subsidy behavior and that's what it is. It's a behavior and that's what it is. It's a behavior and that's what it is.
It's a subsidy behavior is prohibited by the subsidy behavior is prohibited by the subsidy behavior is prohibited by the terms of its entrance to the World Trade terms of its entrance to the World, Trade terms of its entrance to the World Trade Organization. And I intend to enforce Organization and I intend to enforce Organization and I intend to enforce those rules the way they were intended.
Those rules the way they were intended, those rules the way they were intended to be enforced, that's all to be enforced. That's all to be enforced. That's all. And by the way, China will like us better. And by the way, China will like us better. And by the way, China will like us better than they like us down of they'll - than they like us down of they'll - than they like us down of.
They'll respect us and it's probable that we respect us and it's probable that we respect us and it's probable that we won't even have to do it because they won't even have to do it because they won't even have to do it because they know I'm not Playing games, they know, I'm know I'm not playing games, they know I'm know I'm not playing games.
They know I'm not playing games. I probably won't even not playing games. I probably won't even not playing games. I probably won't even have to do have to do have to do, here's China rips us off left and right, here's China rips us off left and right, here's China rips us off left and right and what are they doing?
They're building and what are they doing? They're building and what are they doing? They're building a massive military fortress, which a massive military fortress, which a massive military fortress, which they're not allowed to do in the middle. They're not allowed to do in the middle. They're not allowed to do in the middle of the South China Sea, so they're making of the South China Sea.
So they're making of the South China Sea. So they're making unbelievable deals with us. We have a unbelievable deals with us. We have a unbelievable deals with us. We have a trade deficit with China of almost 500 trade deficit with China of almost 500 trade deficit with China of almost 500 billion dollars a year.
How do we billion dollars a year? How do we billion dollars a year? How do we continue to do this not gonna happen, any continue to do this not gonna happen, any continue to do this, not gonna happen any longer folks not gonna happen any longer, longer folks not gonna happen any longer, longer folks not Gon na happen any longer, number seven, number seven, if shina does number seven, number seven, if shina does number seven.
Number seven, if shina does not stop its illegal activities, which is not stop its illegal activities, which is not stop its illegal activities, which is illegal, including its theft of American illegal, including its theft of American illegal, including its theft of American trade secrets. I will use every lawful trade secrets, I will use every lawful trade secrets.
I will use every lawful presidential power to remedy trade, presidential power to remedy trade, presidential power to remedy trade disputes, very simple, not complicated and disputes very simple, not complicated and disputes very simple. Not complicated and they'll - you watch what happens, including they'll - you watch what happens, including they'll - you watch what happens, including the application of tariffs consistent, the application of tariffs, consistent, the application of tariffs consistent with section 201 and 301 of the Trade with section 201 and 301 Of the Trade with section 201 and 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, they're right there first to Act of 1974. They're right there first to Act of 1974. They're right there.
First to use, no big deal and section 232 of the use, no big deal. And section 232 of the use no big deal and section 232 of the trade expansion act of 1962. Now when you trade expansion act of 1962 now when you trade expansion act of 1962, now when you hear the term trade expansion or trade, hear the term trade expansion or trade, hear the term trade expansion or trade expansion act, not expansion for us, its expansion act Not expansion for us, its expansion act, not expansion for us, its expansion for these other countries that expansion for these other countries that expansion for these other countries that have taken advantage because when I come have taken advantage because when I come have taken advantage because when I come here, I go throughout Ohio, I go here, I go throughout Ohio, I go here, I go throughout Ohio, I go throughout Pennsylvania, I go throughout throughout Pennsylvania, I go throughout throughout Pennsylvania, I go throughout New York State, I go thro throughout New New York State.
I go thro throughout New New York State. I go thro throughout New England, England, England, there's no expansion. We're getting the - there's no expansion. We're getting the - there's no expansion. We're getting the hell beat out of us and it's gonna stop hell beat out of us. And it's gonna stop hell beat out of us and it's gonna stop and we're gonna bring our jobs back to and we're gonna bring our jobs back to and we're gonna bring our jobs back to this country.
We're gonna make product this country, we're gonna make product this country, we're gonna make product again. We again we again we lips all wages. You know we haven't had middle income workers, we haven't had middle income workers. We haven't had middle income workers haven't had a real wage increase in 18, haven't had a real wage increase in 18, haven't had a real wage increase in 18 years.
Think of it. They're working longer years. Think of it. They're working longer years. Think of it. They're working longer. Anybody in this category, anybody you anybody in this category, anybody you anybody in this category, anybody you want a job? Hey, I'll give you - I'll give - want a job. Hey, I'll give you - I'll give - want a job.
Hey, I'll give you - I'll give you a 10 % less. We haven't had - I mean you a 10 % less. We haven't had - I mean you a 10 % less. We haven't had - I mean seriously, we haven't had an effective seriously. We haven't had an effective seriously. We haven't had an effective increase in wages, in real wages in 18, increase in wages, in real wages in 18, increase in wages in real wages in 18 years, a statistic and people now having years, a statistic and people now having years, a statistic and people now Having to work because of Obamacare to a - to work because of Obamacare to a - to work because of Obamacare to a certain extent because of the economy certain extent because of the economy certain extent because of the economy and they have that phony number, the 5 %. And they have that phony number, the 5 % and they have that phony number, the 5 % number.
It's a total phony because when number it's a total phony because when number it's a total phony because when you stop looking for a job, you no longer - you stop looking for a job, you no longer you stop looking for a job, you no longer unemployed. So you come off the rolls so unemployed, so you come off the rolls, so unemployed.
So you come off the rolls. So they come up with these phony numbers. We - they come up with these phony numbers. We - they come up with these phony numbers. We have so much unemployment and even the have so much unemployment and even the have so much unemployment and even the other side admits that the employment - other side admits that the employment other side admits that the employment that we do have is not good jobs in That that we do have is not good jobs in that that we do have is not good jobs in that good jobs.
The good jobs are gone, a lot good jobs. The good jobs are gone, a lot good jobs. The good jobs are gone, a lot of them, they're gone and they're going of them, they're gone and they're going of them, they're gone and they're going and going and going. I'll give you the and going and going. I'll give you the and going and going.
I'll give you the example you've heard me talk about it is example you've heard me talk about it is example you've heard me talk about it is carrier in Indiana, they fired 1,400 carrier in Indiana, they fired 1,400 carrier. In Indiana, they fired 1,400 great people. I won the state of Indiana great people.
I won the state of Indiana, great people. I won the state of Indiana. Bobby Knight helped the greatest. Bobby Bobby Knight helped the greatest. Bobby Bobby Knight helped the greatest Bobby Knight, great coach, but I won the state Knight great coach, but I won the state Knight great coach, but I won the state of Indiana and Kerry gets fired a little of Indiana and Kerry gets fired a little of Indiana And Kerry gets fired a little bit before and they're 1,400 workers bit before and they're 1,400 workers bit before and they're 1,400 workers that were there somewhere there for that were there somewhere there for that were there somewhere there for 25-30 years, 14 years, 18 years.
They all 25-30 years, 14 years, 18 years, they all 25-30 years, 14 years, 18 years. They all followed me. They're great guys, great, followed me. They're great guys, great, followed me. They're great guys, great people, some women, some and great people, people, some women, some and great people, people, some women, some and great people.
And they moved to Mexico and they moved to Mexico and they moved to Mexico. They're moving carrier to Mexico. Now. They're moving carrier to Mexico now. They're moving carrier to Mexico now very simply, the United States is trying very simply, the United States is trying very simply, the United States is trying to figure out, they've been talking about to figure out, they've been talking about to figure out, they've been talking about this For what, seven years, eight years, this for what, seven years, eight years, this for what, seven years, eight years, nine years, because they're losing all nine years because they're losing all nine years because they're losing all these companies to Mexico and other these companies to Mexico.
And other these companies to Mexico and other places, they want to give them money, they places they want to give them money. They places they want to give them money. They want to give them. Low-interest loan said, want to give them. Low-interest loan said, want to give them low-interest loan said never need the money.
How about the never need the money, how about the never need the money? How about the companies that took the low-interest companies that took the low-interest companies that took the low-interest loans are left anyway because we had bad loans are left anyway because we had bad loans are left anyway because we had bad lawyers, right?
They took the money, they lawyers, right? They took the money, they lawyers, right? They took the money. They said he didn't ever said, we had to stay said, he didn't ever said, we had to stay said, he didn't ever said we had to stay, okay, not gonna happen anymore, okay, not gonna happen anymore, okay, not gonna happen anymore.
What we do is we say, I hope you enjoy. What we do is we say, I hope you enjoy. What we do is we say - I hope you enjoy your new plant in Mexico, weather's warm, your new plant in Mexico, weather's warm, your new plant in Mexico, weather's warm, but that's okay. Pretty warm up here, too. But that's okay.
Pretty warm up here, too. But that's okay, pretty warm up here too, but it's only a hundred degrees in this, but it's only a hundred degrees in this, but it's only a hundred degrees in this room. But let me just tell you if I'm room, but let me just tell you if I'm room, but let me just tell you if I'm president, oh I have to do it when - when president - oh I have to do it when, when president - oh I have to Do it when when now I like to be nice to see if I say now, I like to be nice to see.
If I say now, I like to be nice to see if I say when they'll say, oh, he's so conceited when they'll say oh, he's. So conceited, when they'll say, oh, he's so conceited, he's so terrible. So I like to say if I - he's so terrible. So I like to say if I - he's so terrible. So I like to say if I sort of mean when, but I like to say if sort of mean when, but I like to say if sort of mean when, but I like to say if because I'll get you know won't get fair because I'll get you Know won't get fair because I'll get, you know won't get fair traffic, but listen we will have one of traffic, but listen we will have one of traffic.
But listen we will have one of my people that are very, very slow. You my people that are very, very slow, you my people that are very, very slow. You know we have the greatest negotiators in know we have the greatest negotiators in know we have the greatest negotiators in the world, in the United States.
We don't - the world in the United States, we don't the world in the United States, we don't use it. We use political acts and I use it. We use political acts and I use it. We use political acts. And I always say, I want to do it myself, always say I want to do it myself, always say I want to do it myself.
I want to make the call myself. I'm not - I want to make the call myself. I'm not - I want to make the call myself, I'm not supposed to as president of the United supposed to as president of the United, supposed to as president of the United States, be calling up air conditioning States, be calling up air conditioning States, be calling up air Conditioning companies, right, I'm not supposed to be companies, right?
I'm not supposed to be companies, right? I'm not supposed to be calling the president of carrier air calling the president of carrier air calling, the president of carrier air conditioning. But it's so easy folks, it's conditioning, but it's so easy folks, it's conditioning, but it's so easy folks, it's - it's - so it goes so quickly, five minutes, it's - so it goes so quickly, five minutes, it's so it goes so quickly, five minutes, three minutes, two minutes, three Minutes two minutes, three minutes, two minutes and I'll say listen, if you leave, I wish and I'll say, listen, if you leave, I wish and I'll say listen, if you leave, I wish you a lot of luck, but if you do leave you a lot of luck.
But if you do leave you a lot of luck, but if you do leave, when you're firing these 1,400 great, when you're firing these 1,400 great, when you're firing these 1,400 great people, you can go to Mexico. But every people you can go to Mexico. But every people you can go to Mexico, but every single air-conditioning unit that you single air-conditioning unit that you single air-conditioning unit that you make when you sell it back into the make, when you sell it back into the make, when you sell it back into the United States and you think you're gonna, United States and you think you're gonna, United States and you think you're gonna pay no tax, it doesn't work that way, pay no tax.
It doesn't work that way, pay no tax. It doesn't work that way anymore. We're not the stupid people anymore. We're not the stupid people anymore. We're not the stupid people anymore. You're gonna pay a 35 % tax when anymore. You're gonna pay a 35 % tax when anymore. You're gonna pay a 35 % tax. When that unit comes back, that unit comes back, that unit comes back thirty-five, they're gonna pay a nice big tax.
Now it they're gonna pay a nice big tax. Now it they're gonna pay a nice big tax. Now it took me about two seconds to think of, took me about two seconds to think of, took me about two seconds to think of that. I said four years. Why don't they that I said four years, why don't they that I said four years.
Why don't they just say we're gonna do that and you just say we're gonna do that and you just say we're gonna do that and you know what's gonna happen, know what's gonna happen, know what's gonna happen. Number one, they're not gonna move number one, they're not gonna move number one. They're not gonna move because all of a sudden their numbers because all of a sudden their numbers because all of a sudden their numbers won't work.
They're not gonna move. Now won't work, they're not gonna move now won't work. They're not gonna move. Now. They may move from Indiana, but they have - they may move from Indiana, but they have - they may move from Indiana. But they have to say in the United States because to say in the United States because to say in the United States, because we're gonna fight for people to stay in, we're gonna fight for people to stay in.
We're gonna fight for people to stay in the United States, okay, so they can move the United States, okay, so they can move the United States, okay. So they can move around. Hopefully they stay in Indiana around - hopefully they stay in Indiana around - hopefully they stay in Indiana, but they can move around.
But they're not. But they can move around, but they're not. But they can move around, but they're not moving to other countries. And if they do moving to other countries and if they do moving to other countries and if they do, there's gonna be a price to pay. And I'll - there's gonna be a price to pay and I'll - there's gonna be a price to pay.
And I'll tell you what's gonna happen now with tell you what's gonna happen now with - tell you what's gonna happen now with Hillary, some lobbyists or special Hillary, some lobbyists or special Hillary, some lobbyists or special interest group will call her. And she interest group will call her and she interest group will call her and she knows us so good, but they'll call her knows us so good, but they'll call her knows us so good, but they'll call her and she'll leave it alone me.
I don't. And she'll leave it alone me. I don't and she'll leave it alone me. I don't know to anybody folks. I don't know. I do know to anybody folks, I don't know. I do know to anybody folks, I don't know, I do the right thing. So I'll get a call the the right thing, so I'll get a call the the right thing.
So I'll get a call the next day meeting me, but let's say my next day meeting me, but let's say my next day meeting me, but let's say my representatives will get a call. The next representatives will get a call. The next representatives will get a call. The next day and say, please inform the President day and say please inform the President day and say please inform the President of the United States President Trump of the United States President Trump of the United States President Trump that we are staying in the United States.
That we are staying in the United States that we are staying in the United States, whistling, we're staying in the United whistling. We're staying in the United whistling. We're staying in the United States. And that's what's gonna happen States. And that's what's gonna happen, States. And that's what's gonna happen, folks, it's so simple, you don't have to folks, it's so simple, you don't have to folks, it's so simple.
You don't have to give low-interest loans. You don't have - give low-interest loans, you don't have - give low-interest loans. You don't have to do all this nonsense. All you do is to do all this nonsense. All you do is to do all this nonsense. All you do is say folks, you leave the country, I ought say folks, you leave the country, I ought say folks, you leave the country.
I ought to give you another one when China to give you another one. When China to give you another one. When China devalues their currency and they make it devalues their currency and they make it devalues their currency and they make it impossible for our companies to compete impossible for our companies to compete impossible for our companies to compete.
All we do is say, hey, congratulations. All we do is say, hey, congratulations. All we do is say, hey, congratulations. We're charging you whatever the value is, we're charging you whatever the value is, we're charging you whatever the value is. You know, there's a certain value that, you know, there's a certain value that, you know, there's a certain value that you attribute to that devaluation.
We're you attribute to that devaluation. We're you attribute to that devaluation we're charging when you send your goods into charging when you send your goods into charging when you send your goods into the United States. Lot's of luck. This is the United States, lot's of luck. This is the United States, lot's of luck.
This is going to be a penalty. We're putting a - going to be a penalty. We're putting a - going to be a penalty. We're putting a tax end or a tariff on your thing and tax end or a tariff on your thing and tax end or a tariff on your thing and you know what's gonna happen, you know what's gonna happen, you know what's gonna happen?
They won't devalue so fast, believe me they won't devalue so fast, believe me they won't devalue so fast. Believe me they won't devalue so fast. They won't devalue so fast. They won't devalue so fast. We are going to make our country. So rich, we are going to make our country so rich, we are going to make our country.
So rich, again we're gonna save our Social again, we're gonna save our Social again, we're gonna save our Social Security. We're gonna save our Medicare Security. We're gonna save our Medicare Security, we're gonna save our Medicare, others want to cut, we're gonna save. So others want to cut, we're gonna save.
So others want to cut. We're gonna save so much. We're gonna rebuild our military much. We're gonna rebuild our military much, we're gonna rebuild our military. You know our military is totally, you know, our military is totally, you know, our military is totally depleted. I don't know. Did you see the depleted, I don't know, did you see the depleted?
I don't know, did you see the other day there was a documentary about other day. There was a documentary about other day. There was a documentary about our jet fighters. They're so old, they - our jet fighters, they're so old, they - our jet fighters, they're so old, they don't have parts. They don't make the - don't have parts, they don't make the - don't have parts, they don't make the parts anymore.
They get the parts from parts anymore. They get the parts from parts anymore. They get the parts from the plane graveyard. They go to the - the plane graveyard, they go to the - the plane graveyard, they go to the graveyard said they take parts out of graveyard, said they take parts out of graveyard, said they take parts out of planes that have been long ago left to planes that Have been long ago left to planes that have been long ago left to die and they take them out of museums die and they take them out of museums die and they take them out of museums.
They take parts out of planes that are - they take parts out of planes that are - they take parts out of planes that are in museums, not gonna happen anymore in museums, not gonna happen anymore in museums, not gonna happen anymore. Folks, we're gonna rebuild our military folks, we're gonna rebuild our military.
Folks, we're gonna rebuild our military, it's gonna create jobs, it's gonna create jobs, it's gonna create jobs. We're gonna have the best jet fighters. We're gonna have the best jet fighters. We're gonna have the best jet fighters. We're gonna have new beautiful equipment, we're gonna have new beautiful equipment, we're gonna have new beautiful equipment, we're gonna take care of our veterans.
We're gonna take care of our veterans. We're gonna take care of our veterans. We're gonna take care of our veterans and folks we are going to have a border and folks we are going to have a border and folks we are going to have a border. Again, we'll have a border. I mean you see again we'll have a border.
I mean you see again we'll have a border. I mean you see what's happening. We're gonna have a - what's happening, we're gonna have a - what's happening. We're gonna have a border. I get along great border, I get along great border, I get along great. Mexico take my hat off to them if they Mexico take my hat off to them, if they Mexico take my hat off to them, if they could get away with it, I think it's could get away with it.
I think it's could get away with it. I think it's great that bringing our companies China great, that bringing our companies China great, that bringing our companies. China, take my hat off. I'm not angry at Japan, take my hat off. I'm not angry at Japan. Take my hat off. I'm not angry at Japan. I'm not angry at China.
I'm not angry at - I'm not angry at China. I'm not angry at - I'm not angry at China. I'm not angry at Mexico. I'm angry at our leaders who are Mexico. I'm angry at our leaders who are Mexico. I'm angry at our leaders who are so stupid that they don't know what's so stupid that they don't know what's so stupid that they don't know what's going on.
They don't know what is going going on. They don't know what is going going on. They don't know what is going on. Our country is being destroyed. It's on our country is being destroyed. It's on our country is being destroyed, it's being destroyed. So I just want to tell being destroyed. So I just want to tell being destroyed.
So I just want to tell you this and by the way, for the people you this and by the way, for the people you this and by the way, for the people of Ohio, Hillary Clinton, effectively of Ohio, Hillary Clinton, effectively of Ohio Hillary Clinton, effectively wants To abolish the Second Amendment we wants to abolish the Second Amendment we wants to abolish the Second Amendment.
We are going to protect our second are going to protect our second are going to protect our second. We you know that you see what's going on. We - you know that you see what's going on. We - you know that you see what's going on. We are going to protect, you know, the NRA. We are going to protect, you know, the NRA. We are going to protect, you know, the NRA gave me their endorsement, one of the - gave me their endorsement, one of the gave me their endorsement, one of the earliest endorsements.
I think the earliest endorsements, I think the earliest endorsements, I think the earliest of course, but they ever gave and Wayne and Chris and all the people and Wayne and Chris and all the people and Wayne and Chris and all the people at the NRA, my son, Don and and Eric, their at the NRA, my son, Don and and Eric, their at the NRA, my son, Don and and Eric, their member.
So am I a member, but I'll tell member. So am I a member, but I'll tell member. So am I a member? But I'll tell you what they could people, Wayne, you what they could people, Wayne, you what they could people, Wayne, Chris, the whole group, I've gotten to Chris, the whole group, I've gotten to Chris, the whole group, I've gotten to know them.
So well, they great people. They know them so well, they great people, they know them. So well, they great people. They want what's good for this country. First want what's good for this country. First want what's good for this country. First, believe me first, they want what's good, believe me first, they want what's good, believe me first, they want what's good for the country, they're great people.
So for the country they're great people. So for the country they're great people. So we are going to start winning again. We are going to start winning again. We are going to start winning again. We're not winning at anything. We don't - we're not winning at anything. We don't - we're not winning at anything.
We don't win with military. We don't win with win with military. We don't win with win with military. We don't win with healthcare. We don't win with education. Healthcare, we don't win with education. Healthcare, we don't win with education. And by the way, we're cutting common core. And by the way, we're cutting common core and by the way, we're cutting common core and we're gonna bring it back local and we're gonna bring it back local and we're gonna bring it back, local, local, local, local education.
But we're gonna start winning again, but we're gonna start winning again. But we're gonna start winning again. We're gonna win with our military. We're - we're gonna win with our military. We're - we're gonna win with our military. We're gonna win for our veterans, our veterans gonna win for our veterans, our veterans gonna win for our veterans.
Our veterans have been treated so badly. We're gonna have been treated so badly. We're gonna have been treated so badly. We're gonna win for our miners that I can tell you win for our miners that I can tell you win for our miners that I can tell you now put the miners back to work gonna now put the miners back to work gonna now Put the miners back to work gonna put everybody back to work, we're gonna put everybody back to work.
We're gonna put everybody back to work. We're gonna start winning again, folks. We're gonna start winning again, folks. We're gonna start winning again folks, we're gonna win so much, you're gonna get so sick of win so much you're gonna get so sick of win so much you're gonna get so sick of it, you're gonna say I can't stand the It you're gonna say I can't stand the it, you're gonna say I can't stand the winning.
I will get a call from winning. I will get a call from winning. I will get a call from representatives from the great state of representatives from the great state of representatives from the great state of Ohio saying mr. president, our people can Ohio saying mr. president, our people can Ohio saying mr.
president. Our people can no longer stand it. They can't take it, no longer stand it, they can't take it, no longer stand it, they can't take it. You're winning too much. Please, mr. you're winning too much please, mr. you're winning too much please. Mr. president. Please stop winning. You're president.
Please stop. Winning you're president. Please stop winning, you're winning with jobs, you're winning with winning with jobs, you're winning with winning with jobs, you're winning with military, please. Let's have a few losses. Military, please. Let's have a few losses. Military, please. Let's have a few losses like it used to be where we could lose like it used to be, where we could lose like it used to be, where we could lose all the time.
And I'll say, you know what all the time and I'll say, you know what all the time and I'll say, you know what I'll say, I'll say no, no, no, we're gonna, I'll say I'll say no, no, no. We're gonna, I'll say, I'll say no, no, no, we're gonna keep winning. We're gonna win with, keep winning. We're gonna win with, keep winning.
We're gonna win with everything. We're gonna win with our everything we're gonna win with our everything we're gonna win with our military, we're gonna win with every military. We're gonna win with every military, we're gonna win with every single thing we do because we are going single thing we do because we are going single thing we do because we are going to make our country great again and to make our country great.